Missouri, session 2026, HB2484.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 273.325 and 273.342, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 273.325 and 273.342, to read as follows:
273.325. 1. Sections 273.325 to 273.357 shall be known as the "Animal Care
Facilities Act".
2. As used in sections 273.325 to 273.357, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adequate food", the provision, at suitable intervals of not more than twelve
hours, unless the dietary requirements of the species require a longer interval, of a quantity of
wholesome foodstuff, suitable for the species and age, sufficient to maintain a reasonable
level of nutrition in each animal, all of which foodstuff is served in a safe receptacle, dish, or
container;
(2) "Adequate housing", the continuous provision of a sanitary facility, protection
from the extremes of weather conditions, proper ventilation, and appropriate space depending
on the species of animal, as defined by regulations of the USDA, as revised;
(3) "Adequate water", the provision, either continuously or at intervals suitable to the
species, which intervals shall not exceed eight hours, of a supply of potable water in a safe
receptacle, dish, or container;
(4) "Animal", any dog or cat, which is being used, or is intended for use, for research,
teaching, testing, breeding, or exhibition purposes, or as a pet;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2484 2
(5) "Animal shelter", a facility which is used to house or contain animals, which is
owned, operated, or maintained by an incorporated humane society, animal welfare society,
society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other not-for-profit organization devoted to
the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of such animals, or a person whose primary
purpose is to act as an animal rescue, to collect and care for unwanted animals or to offer
them for adoption;
(6) "Animal welfare official", any licensed veterinarian, designated by and under the
supervision of the state veterinarian, who administers or assists in the administration of the
provisions of sections 273.325 to 273.357, or any appointee of the director, and shall include
all deputy state veterinarians;
(7) "Boarding kennel", a place or establishment, other than a pound or animal shelter,
where animals, not owned by the proprietor, are sheltered, fed, and watered in return for a
consideration; however, "boarding kennel" shall not include hobby or show breeders who
board intact females for a period of time for the sole purpose of breeding such intact females,
and shall not include individuals who temporarily, and not in the normal course of business,
board or care for animals owned by other individuals;
(8) "Commercial breeder", a person, other than a hobby or show breeder, engaged in
the business of breeding animals for sale or for exchange in return for a consideration, and
who harbors more than three intact females for the primary purpose of breeding animals for
sale;
(9) "Commercial kennel", a kennel which performs grooming or training services for
animals, and may or may not render boarding services in return for a consideration;
(10) "Contract kennel", any facility operated by any person or entity other than the
state or any political subdivision of the state, for the purpose of impounding or harboring
seized, stray, homeless, abandoned or unwanted animals, on behalf of and pursuant to a
contract with the state or any political subdivision;
(11) "Dealer", any person who is engaged in the business of buying for resale, selling
or exchanging animals, as a principal or agent, or who holds himself out to be so engaged or
is otherwise classified as a dealer by the USDA as defined by regulations of the USDA;
(12) "Director", the director of the department of agriculture of the state of Missouri;
(13) "Hobby or show breeder", a noncommercial breeder who breeds dogs or cats
with the primary purpose of exhibiting or showing dogs or cats, improving the breed or
selling the dogs or cats, and having no more than ten intact females. Such breeder shall be
classified as a hobby or show breeder if such person only sells animals to other breeders or to
individuals;

HB 2484 3
(14) "Humane euthanasia", the act or practice of putting an animal to death in a
humane or instantaneous manner under guidelines and procedures established by rules
promulgated by the director;
(15) "Infant puppy or kitten", any dog or cat under twelve weeks of age;
(16) "Intact female", with respect to a dog, refers to a female dog between the ages of
six months and ten years of age which is capable of being bred; and with respect to a cat,
refers to a female cat between the ages of six months and eight years which is capable of
being bred;
[(16)] (17) "Micro shelter", an animal shelter that houses no more than ten
animals at any one time, except infant puppies or kittens born to an animal housed at
the shelter shall not be included in the count of animals for determining if an operation
meets the standards for a micro shelter;
(18) "Pet shop", any facility where animals are bought, sold, exchanged, or offered
for retail sale to the general public;
[(17)] (19) "Pound" or "dog pound", a facility operated by the state or any political
subdivision of the state for the purpose of impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless,
abandoned, or unwanted animals;
[(18)] (20) "State veterinarian", the state veterinarian as provided by chapter 267;
[(19)] (21) "USDA", the United States Department of Agriculture.
273.342. 1. Persons engaged in breeding dogs and cats who harbor three or less intact
females shall be exempt from the provisions of sections 273.325 to 273.357.
2. A hobby or show breeder shall be exempt from the licensure and inspection
requirements of sections 273.325 to 273.357. The director shall develop a form for
registration of persons who meet the definition of hobby or show breeder, and any such hobby
or show breeder shall register annually with the director for the purpose of establishing that
such person is a hobby or show breeder, at no cost to said hobby or show breeder.
3. A micro shelter shall be exempt from the licensure and inspection
requirements of sections 273.325 to 273.357. The director shall develop a form for
registration of animal shelters that meet the definition of a micro shelter, and any such
micro shelter shall register annually with the director for the purpose of establishing
that such entity is a micro shelter, at no cost to the micro shelter.
✔